Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4123.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Center" means the center for educational performance and information created in section 94a of the school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1694a. (b) "Department" means the department of labor and economic opportunity. (c) "Eligible Subject to subparagraph (ix), "eligible institution" means a postsecondary educational institution that meets all of the following:requirements of subparagraphs (i) to (viii), as follows: (i) Is an accredited public community college in this state. (ii) Complies with applicable restraints on fee and tuition rate increases, if any, provided for in article II of the school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1801 to 388.1830. (iii) Participates in quality assurance protocols established by the department for purposes of accurately tracking student outcomes described in section 5(g) and (h). (iv) Submits a written report of all of the following information to the department by not later than October 1, 2020 and each year thereafter by not later than June 30: (A) The institution's goals, expressed numerically, for student persistence and credential completion. (B) A demonstration of ways in which the institution follows best practices in providing programs of study and student support based on national evidence, including partnering with institutions that grant bachelor's degrees, providing coursework for general studies students and requirements of associate degrees and certificates, providing stackable industry-recognized micro credentials within certificate and associate degree programs, providing credit for prior learning, providing work-based learning opportunities, and providing holistic student support services. (C) The institution's current policy for determining a student's eligibility to enroll directly into freshman-level courses without remediation. (D) A description of and evidence base for all models of remediation currently offered by the institution. (v) By not later than August 1, 2023, for all Michigan reconnect grant students who need academic remediation, provides appropriate academic support, including all of the following: (A) A corequisite model of academic support for gateway English and mathematics pathway courses under which a student concurrently enrolls in a developmental education course and a freshman-level course in the same or a related subject area for each subject area needing remediation, to be completed during the same semester as the freshman-level course. An institution providing corequisite support as described in this sub-subparagraph remains eligible whether or not it charges tuition or fees for the developmental education portions of the program. (B) Any additional remediation programs as the institution considers appropriate, subject to all of the following: (I) An additional remediation program must serve as a supplement to, not as an alternative to, the corequisite model described in sub-subparagraph (A). (II) For each additional remediation program, the institution must include in its annual report, pursuant to subparagraph (iv)(D), an evidence-based rationale for the program. (III) An additional remediation program must be offered at no charge to Michigan reconnect grant students or offered outside of the institutional tuition and fee structure. For a program offered outside of its tuition and fee structure, an institution may use foundation or other local funding sources or refer students to adult education providers. (vi) Provides reasonable accommodations to Michigan reconnect grant students with disabilities as required by section 504 of title V of the rehabilitation act of 1973, 29 USC 794, and subtitle A of title II of the Americans with disabilities act of 1990, 42 USC 12131 to 12134. (vii) Designates an individual employed by the institution as the institution's primary contact with the department for purposes of coordinating the administration of the Michigan reconnect grant program in accordance with this act. (viii) Demonstrates, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, that the institution does all of the following: (A) Is working to adopt best practices for partnering with bachelor's degree granting institutions, providing coursework for general studies and requirements of associate degrees and certificates, providing stackable industry-recognized micro credentials within certificate and associate degree programs, providing credit for prior learning, providing work-based learning opportunities, providing holistic student support services, and providing a guided pathways model by which students receive early advising and career exploration, set a pathway of interest during their first term, and develop a full program plan within their first or second term. (B) Informs Michigan reconnect grant students upon admission of its policies for converting prior learning into community college credit and any means available to maximize acceleration, as described in subparagraph (iv)(B). (C) Supports adult learners by offering competency-based courses and programs. (D) Awards academic credit to learners scoring the minimum American Council on Education standard score on college-level credit exams from organizations such as CLEP and DSST. (E) Encourages Michigan reconnect grant students to establish an account on the institution's employment database. (F) Identifies best practices in student success, reviews evidence to support best practices, and discusses with relevant experts emerging opportunities to increase the success of Michigan reconnect grant students. Subject to section 5a, an institution must perform the requirements of this sub-subparagraph in consultation with the Michigan Center for Adult College Success. (ix) For purposes of section 7(b) only, eligible institution includes an intermediate school district, career-tech facility, technical college, private training provider, apprenticeship program, or other provider that offers a program in this state leading to an industry-recognized certificate or credential, whether or not that program is a Pell-eligible program as that term is defined in section 13 of the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1713, and whose program participants are not otherwise eligible for grants under the Michigan reconnect grant recipient act, 2020 PA 68, MCL 390.1711 to 390.1723. (d) "Industry-recognized certificate or credential" means a certificate or credential that is portable and is sought or accepted by multiple employers within an industry for purposes of recruitment, hiring, or promotion. (e) "Michigan reconnect grant student" means a student admitted to and enrolled in an eligible institution, regardless of whether the student is receiving a Michigan reconnect grant under this act. Sec. 7. Subject to appropriation, the department may expend Michigan reconnect grant program money to award do all of the following: (a) Award grants and support its other duties as described in section 5. (b) Award grants to participants in, and otherwise provide support to, programs leading to industry-recognized certificates or credentials offered by eligible institutions described in section 3(c)(ix).